Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 1. In General
§ 37-2-115.
Examination of records of intrastate business of utilities; authority generally.

The commission, or upon order of the commission, any commissioner, or any person or persons employed by the commission, shall upon demand have the right, insofar as applies to intrastate business, to inspect or examine the books, papers, accounts, documents, plant, property and facilities of any public utility operating in Wyoming, and to examine under oath any officer, agent or employee of such public utility in relation to its business and affairs; provided, that any person other than one (1) of the commissioners shall produce when so requested his authority to make inspections or examinations under the hand of a commissioner or of the secretary and under the seal of the commission.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 14; C.S. 1920, § 5466; R.S. 1931, § 94-114; C.S. 1945, § 64-114; W.S. 1957, § 37-14.

Reports, testing accuracy. —

Protestant as to rates should be permitted to test accuracy of transportation company's reports, just as commission has right to do, even though reports to commission are made under oath. Gore v. John, 61 Wyo. 246, 157 P.2d 552,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1945).

Cited

in

Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(1929).

§ 37-2-116.
Ordering production of records.

The commission, by order, may require any public utility or any officer or agent thereof to produce within the state at such time and place as it may designate, any accounts, records, memoranda, books or papers kept in any office or place without or within the state, or in its discretion may in lieu of originals order the production of verified copies thereof in order that an examination thereof insofar as they relate to intrastate business, may be made by the commission or by any person under its direction.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 15; C.S. 1920, § 5467; R.S. 1931, § 94-115; C.S. 1945, § 64-115; W.S. 1957, § 37-15.

§ 37-2-117.
Commission may initiate investigation.

Whenever the commission shall believe that an investigation of any act or omission to act, accomplished or proposed, or an investigation of any rate, service, facility or service regulation of any public utility should be made in order to secure compliance with the provisions of this act and orders of the commission, it may of its own motion summarily investigate the same.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 16; 1917, ch. 74, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 5468; R.S. 1931, § 94-116; C.S. 1945, § 64-116; W.S. 1957, § 37-16.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.

Applied

in

Pacific Power & Light Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 677 P.2d 799,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo. 1984).

Stated

in

Union Tel. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 907 P.2d 340,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Mountain States Tel. & Tel. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 745 P.2d 563,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 544

(Wyo. 1987).

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

§ 37-2-118.
Who may make complaint.

Any public utility, person, municipality or the attorney general may complain to the commission of anything, actual or proposed, done or omitted to be done in violation of W.S. 37-1 through 37-64 [§§

37-1-101

through

37-3-114

] or W.S. 37-260 through 37-272 [§§

37-12-201

through

37-12-213

], or of an order of the commission.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 17; 1917, ch. 74, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 5469; R.S. 1931, § 94-117; C.S. 1945, § 64-117; W.S. 1957, § 37-17; Laws 1977, ch. 137, § 1.

Section does not deal with factors considered by commissionin fixing rates. —

Section

40-9-102

, by reference to this section, attempts to inject another factor, to-wit, the standard of heating units in any gas distributed by a utility, for consideration by the commission. However, an examination of this section reveals that it merely deals with the matter of who may make a complaint to the commission and has nothing whatever to do with the factors which the commission may consider in fixing rates under §§

37-2-119

and

37-2-122

. It is evident that §

40-9-102

was carelessly drawn and enacted. Application of Northern Utils. Co., 70 Wyo. 225, 247 P.2d 767,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1952).

Stated

in

Dubois Tel. Exch. v. Mountain States Tel. & Tel. Co., 429 P.2d 812,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1967).

Cited

in

In re Hamilton Pipe Line Co., 65 Wyo. 350, 202 P.2d 184,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1949); Union Tel. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 821 P.2d 550,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1991).

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

§ 37-2-119.
Matters to be considered and determined in investigation.

In conducting any investigation pursuant to the provisions of this act the commission may investigate, consider and determine such matters as the cost or value, or both, of the property and business of any public utility, used and useful for the convenience of the public, and all matters affecting or influencing such cost or value, the operating statistics for any public utility both as to revenues and expenses and as to the physical features of operation in such detail as the commission may deem advisable; the earnings, investment and expenditures of any such corporation as a whole within this state, and as to rates in plants of any water, electrical or gas corporations, the geographical location thereof shall be considered as well as the population of the municipality in which such plant is located.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 18; C.S. 1920, § 5470; R.S. 1931, § 94-118; C.S. 1945, § 64-118; W.S. 1957, § 37-18; Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to rates generally, see chapter 3 of this title.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note under §

37-2-110

.

“Used and useful” requirement,

which must be met by any business of a public utility before the utility may consider the value of that business in fixing the rate base for its operation, must be as of the time of rate consideration. Pacific Power & Light Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 677 P.2d 799,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 831, 105 S. Ct. 120, 83 L. Ed. 2d 62, 1984 U.S. LEXIS 3246 (U.S. 1984).

Financial position. —

Public Service Commission did not err in conducting an analysis of the utility company's financial position, both company-wide and on a Wyoming basis, in the context of determining the justness and reasonableness of a rate increase, proposed by the utility company following a catastrophic failure that forced it to obtain power from outside sources at unforeseeably high prices. PacifiCorp v. PSC, 2004 WY 164, 103 P.3d 862,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 2004).

Applied

in

In re N. Utils. Co., 70 Wyo. 225, 247 P.2d 767,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1952).

Quoted

in

Montana Dakota Utils. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 847 P.2d 978,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

Mountain States Tel. & Tel. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 745 P.2d 563,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 544

(Wyo. 1987).

§ 37-2-120.
Order in case of violation; public hearing required for change in rate or service.

Whenever, after investigation in accordance with the provisions of this act, the commission shall be of the opinion that any provisions or requirements of this act, or any order of the commission is being, has been, or is about to be violated, it may make and enter of record an order in the premises, specifying the actual or proposed acts or omissions to act which constitute such real or proposed violations, and require that such violations be discontinued or rectified, or both, or that it be prevented. No order, however, shall be made by the commission which requires the change of any rate or service, facility or service regulation except as otherwise specifically provided, unless or until all parties are afforded an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 19; 1917, ch. 74, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 5471; R.S. 1931, § 94-119; C.S. 1945, § 64-119; W.S. 1957, § 37-19; Laws 1995, ch. 192, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to court action to prevent or remedy violations of laws or orders of commission, see §

37-2-215

.

As to liability of utility for loss or damage caused by violations of laws or orders of commission, see §

37-12-208

.

As to criminal penalties for violations by utility generally, see §§

37-12-211

,

37-12-212

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Trial-type, not argumentative-type, hearing required. —

A public hearing held pursuant to this section requires a determination of adjudicative facts. The statute contemplates a trial-type hearing and not a legislative argumentative-type hearing. Tri-State Generation & Transmission Ass'n v. Wyoming Pub. Serv., 735 P.2d 718,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 425

(Wyo. 1987).

Requirement of “public hearing” fulfilled. —

Hearings on a long distance telephone company's complaint fulfilled the requirement of a public hearing, where extensive hearings were held, notice was given of the hearings, and the requisite opportunity to cross-examine and to produce witnesses was provided. Union Tel. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 821 P.2d 550,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 37-2-121.
When rate to be changed by commission; nontraditional rate making.

If upon hearing and investigation, any rate shall be found by the commission to be inadequate or unremunerative, or to be unjust, or unreasonable, or unjustly discriminatory, or unduly preferential or otherwise in any respect in violation of any provision of this act, the commission, within the time periods provided under W.S. 37-3-106(c) may fix and order substituted therefor a rate as it shall determine to be just and reasonable, and in compliance with the provisions of this act. The rate so ascertained, determined and fixed by the commission shall be charged, enforced, collected and observed by the public utility for the period of time fixed by the commission. The rates may contain provisions for incentives for improvement of the public utility’s performance or efficiency, lowering of operating costs, control of expenses or improvement and upgrading or modernization of its services or facilities. Any public utility may apply to the commission for its consent to use innovative, incentive or nontraditional rate making methods. In conducting any investigation and holding any hearing in response thereto, the commission may consider and approve proposals which include any rate, service regulation, rate setting concept, economic development rate, service concept, nondiscriminatory revenue sharing or profit-sharing form of regulation and policy, including policies for the encouragement of the development of public utility infrastructure, services, facilities or plant within the state, which can be shown by substantial evidence to support and be consistent with the public interest.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 20; C.S. 1920, § 5472; R.S. 1931, § 94-120; C.S. 1945, § 64-120; W.S. 1957, § 37-20; Laws 1995, ch. 192, § 2; 2005, ch. 154, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to rates generally, see chapter 3 of this title.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “within the time periods provided under
W.S. 37-3-106(c)” in the first sentence, and made stylistic changes.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.

Commission may use adjudicative proceedings to set and adjust rates.

Such proceedings do not constitute the promulgation of “rules.” Montana-Dakota Utils. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 746 P.2d 1272,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 559

(Wyo. 1987).

Commission did not err in denying surcharge. —

Utility company failed to prove by substantial evidence that its proposed surcharge, following a catastrophic failure that required it to obtain outside sources to serve customers, was just, reasonable, and in the public interest, as required by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

37-2-121

, and thus the Public Service Commission did not act arbitrarily or capriciously in refusing to grant the requested surcharge. PacifiCorp v. PSC, 2004 WY 164, 103 P.3d 862,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 2004).

Commission empowered to reduce incentive award. —

In line with its continuing jurisdiction and the statutory duty to maintain rates which are just and reasonable, the commission necessarily has the “implied or incidental” authority to reduce an incentive award previously granted under §

37-3-115

. The commission's continuing jurisdiction gives it the authority to adjust an incentive award, either up or down, after the original grant, so long as the incentive award remains between zero and 10 percent of the savings and it is just and reasonable. Montana-Dakota Utils. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 746 P.2d 1272,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 559

(Wyo. 1987).

Refunds not prohibited. —

The rule against retroactive ratemaking did not prohibit refunds ordered by the commission in connection with a gas balancing account set up to provide an automatic rate adjustment. MGTC, Inc. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 735 P.2d 103,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 433

(Wyo. 1987).

Quoted

in

In re N. Utils. Co., 70 Wyo. 225, 247 P.2d 767,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1952); Great W. Sugar Co. v. Johnson, 624 P.2d 1184,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1981); Pacific Power & Light Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 677 P.2d 799,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(1929); Union Tel. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 821 P.2d 550,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 37-2-122.
Matters considered in fixing rates; order changing services or facilities; qualifying facilities contracts.

In determining what are just and reasonable rates the commission may take into consideration availability and reliability of service, depreciation of plant, technological obsolescence of equipment, expense of operation, physical and other values of the plant, system, business and properties of the public utility whose rates are under consideration. In determining just and reasonable rates for electricity the commission shall consider common sets of facts developed pursuant to W.S. 37-2-114(b)(i) and regional benefits provided by the utility.

If, upon hearing and investigation, any service or service regulation of any public utility shall be found by the commission to be unjustly discriminatory or unduly preferential, or any service or facility shall be found to be inadequate or unsafe, or any service regulation shall be found to be unjust or unreasonable, or any service, facility or service regulation shall be found otherwise in any respect to be in violation of any provisions of this act, the commission may prescribe and order substituted therefor such service, facility or service regulation, as it shall determine to be adequate and safe, or just and reasonable, as the case may be and otherwise in compliance with the provisions of this act, including any provisions concerning the availability or reliability of service. It shall be the duty of the public utility to comply with and conform to such determination and order of the commission.

In setting rates, the commission shall allow the inclusion of purchase power cost from a qualifying facility only to the extent that the cost of energy, capacity or both in the transaction are determined by the commission to be less than or equal to the utility’s avoided cost, considering the cost of energy or capacity from all other available generation sources and the incremental cost of transporting the energy from a qualifying facility to customer load. This subsection shall not be interpreted in a manner inconsistent with the requirements of applicable federal statutes and regulations.

As used in this section:

“Avoided cost” means to the extent that a distribution cooperative is an all-requirements power supply customer of a generation and transmission cooperative or other wholesale power supplier, the distribution cooperative’s avoided costs are the generation and transmission cooperative’s or wholesale power supplier’s avoided cost;

“Qualifying facility” means a facility that meets the qualification standards used in federal regulations promulgated under the federal Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act.

The commission may, in all matters relating to plans, proposals or applications for authority to construct or retire major facilities having any immediate or potential effect on rates charged to customers or to recover through rates any cost thereof, consider reliability and cost externalities incurred by the state of Wyoming, including but not limited to economic and employment impacts.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 21; 1917, ch. 74, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 5473; R.S. 1931, § 94-121; C.S. 1945, § 64-121; W.S. 1957, § 37-21; Laws 1995, ch. 192, § 2; 2010, ch. 78, § 1; 2018 ch. 57, § 1, effective March 12, 2018; 2021 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to rates generally, see ch. 3 of this title.

The 2010 amendment,

in (a), added the present last sentence.

Laws 2010, ch. 78, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

The 2018 amendment,

added (c) and (d).

Laws 2018, ch. 57, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2018.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "and" for "or" following "consideration availability" in (a); and added (e).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2010, ch 78 § 2, provides: “The legislature finds that in the regulation of electric transmission, regional factors should be considered by the public utility regulatory authorities of the various affected states to best promote the interests of the citizens of the region. The development and use of a common set of facts and other cooperation and coordination between the regulatory authorities in the regulation of electric transmission will help establish market certainty and facilitate business decision making, ultimately resulting in more affordable, reliable and environmentally responsible energy.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note to §

37-2-110

.

Rate must be just and reasonable and produce proper returnon investment. —

A public utility is entitled to have a rate increase that is “just and reasonable” and which will be productive of a proper return on its investment. Application of Northern Utils. Co., 70 Wyo. 225, 247 P.2d 767,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1952).

“Service on customer's premises” held a proper charge to utility'soperations. —

The commission properly charged the item “service on customer's premises” to a public utility's operations where the evidence showed without dispute that these services were for the purpose of checking the gas used in the public utility's distribution system, were rendered to all customers who might call for them, embraced the checking of leaks and turning gas on and off and were a safety factor for both the customer and the public utility. Application of Northern Utils. Co., 70 Wyo. 225, 247 P.2d 767,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1952).

Utility cannot, as “operation expenses,” pass loss of failedproject along to consumers. —

Where a public utility suffers financial loss due to the failure of a project intended to become “used and useful” property under §

37-2-119

, it may not pass the loss along to consumers as an “expense of operation.” Pacific Power & Light Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 677 P.2d 799,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 831, 105 S. Ct. 120, 83 L. Ed. 2d 62, 1984 U.S. LEXIS 3246 (U.S. 1984).

But may do so only where prior approval acquired from commission.—

A regulated public utility need not seek approval of the commission before acquiring an interest in a nuclear power construction project; however, before the utility may have the consumers bear the costs of such a failed investment, prior approval must have been acquired from the commission, in accord with its broad regulatory powers derived from this section and chapter 6. Pacific Power & Light Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 677 P.2d 799,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 831, 105 S. Ct. 120, 83 L. Ed. 2d 62, 1984 U.S. LEXIS 3246 (U.S. 1984).

Public Service Commission is given broad Financial position.

Public Service Commission did not err in conducting an analysis of the utility company's financial position, both company-wide and on a Wyoming basis, in the context of determining the justness and reasonableness of a rate increase, proposed by the utility company following a catastrophic failure that forced it to obtain power from outside sources at unforeseeably high prices. PacifiCorp v. PSC, 2004 WY 164, 103 P.3d 862,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 2004).

Quoted

in

Montana Dakota Utils. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 847 P.2d 978,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

Mountain States Tel. & Tel. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 745 P.2d 563,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 544

(Wyo. 1987); Union Tel. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 821 P.2d 550,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1991).

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Public utility's right to recover cost of nuclear power plants abandoned before completion, 83 ALR4th 183.

§ 37-2-123.
Order apportioning expenses between joint public utilities.

Whenever any order of the commission involves expenditures of any sum or sums by public utilities rendering any joint service or services, and the public utilities affected thereby shall fail to agree upon the division or apportionment thereof within a reasonable time after the service of such order, the commission may issue a supplemental order declaring the apportionment or division of such expense.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 22; C.S. 1920, § 5474; R.S. 1931, § 94-122; C.S. 1945, § 64-122; W.S. 1957, § 37-22.

§ 37-2-124.
Records open to inspection by public; exceptions.

All reports, records and accounts in the possession of the commission shall be open to inspection by the public at all times except as otherwise provided in this act or as ordered by the commission and under rules prescribed by the commission.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 23; C.S. 1920, § 5475; R.S. 1931, § 94-123; C.S. 1945, § 64-123; W.S. 1957, § 37-23.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note under §

37-2-110

.

§ 37-2-125.
Collection and disposition of fees.

The public service commission is hereby authorized and empowered in the conduct of business coming before it to collect in advance the following fees:

For filing application for permit, five dollars ($5.00) and for certificate of convenience and necessity, fifteen dollars ($15.00);

For filing applications for amendment or assignment of certificates of convenience and necessity, five dollars ($5.00);

For filing contests, five dollars ($5.00);

For each certificate and seal, two dollars ($2.00);

For copies of records, judgments, and orders, one dollar ($1.00) for the first one hundred (100) words, and twenty-five cents ($.25) per folio for each subsequent folio, and if certified under seal, one dollar ($1.00) additional;

For issuing summons or subpoenas, one dollar ($1.00) each;

For service of summons or subpoenas by registered mail, fifty cents ($.50) and for personal service, by a person authorized to make such service, the same fee that sheriffs receive for such service;

In all hearings on contests or on investigations, the fees for witnesses and all other costs shall be taxed against the parties in interest as determined by the commission;

For petitions filed under W.S.

37-6-102

, fifteen dollars ($15.00) each.

All fees collected by the commission shall be paid to the state treasurer as collected, and shall be credited to the general fund.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 24; C.S. 1920, § 5476; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 81; R.S. 1931, § 94-124; Laws 1941, ch. 57, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 64-124; W.S. 1957, § 37-24; Laws 1961, ch. 139, § 1; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to receipt and disbursement of public funds generally, §

9-4-101

et seq.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “37-6-102” for “section 37-66, Wyoming Statutes, 1957” in (a)(ix).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(1929).

§ 37-2-126.
Report to the governor.

The commission shall, as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

, report to the governor, including in such detail as the commission may deem expedient all proceedings and investigations of the commission during such period and shall contain abstracts of the reports of public utilities prepared by the commission. It shall also contain the recommendations of the commission for new legislation and any other matters the commission desires to call to the attention of the governor and the legislature.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 25; C.S. 1920, § 5477; R.S. 1931, § 94-125; C.S. 1945, § 64-125; W.S. 1957, § 37-25; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “W.S.

9-2-1014

” for “section 9-21 of the statutes” in the first sentence.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 37-2-127.
Implied and incidental powers; requiring information from local utilities.

In addition to the powers herein specifically granted, the commission shall have such implied or incidental powers as may be necessary and proper, effectually to carry out, perform and execute all the powers so granted. The commission shall have the power to require public utilities whose operations are purely local in extent and use to file in the office of the commission a list of their stockholders, officers and directors, with the residence and post office address of, and the amount of stock held by each.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 26; C.S. 1920, § 5478; R.S. 1931, § 94-126; C.S. 1945, § 64-126; W.S. 1957, § 37-26.

Implied powers are only those derived by necessary implication from express statutory authority

granted to the commission. Public Serv. Comm'n v. Formal Complaint of WWZ Co., 641 P.2d 183,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 300

(Wyo. 1982).

Jurisdiction of commission does not extend to publication of yellow pages directory

which is not a service furnished to or for the public. In re Mountain States Tel. & Tel. Co., 745 P.2d 563,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 544

(Wyo. 1987).

Applied

in

Montana-Dakota Utils. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 746 P.2d 1272,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 559

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Union Tel. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 821 P.2d 550,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1991); US West Communs. v. Wyoming PSC, 15 P.3d 722,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Public service commission's implied authority to order refund of public utility revenues, 41 ALR5th 783.

§ 37-2-128.
Civil penalty for violation of federal Pipeline Safety, Regulatory Certainty, and Job Creation Act of 2011; generally.

Where the commission has exercised authority under the provisions of the federal Pipeline Safety, Regulatory Certainty and Job Creation Act of 2011, 49 U.S.C. § 60101, et seq., and amendments thereto, to regulate gas safety in the state of Wyoming, any person or persons as defined in that act who hereafter violate any provision of that act as made applicable to jurisdictional activities within the state of Wyoming may be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) for violation for each day that the violation persists. However, the maximum civil penalty shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) for any related series of violations.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 23, § 1; 1989, ch. 154, § 1; 1994, ch. 3, § 1; 2009, ch. 144, § 1; 2012, ch. 84, § 103.

Cross references. —

As to safety standards generally, see §

37-3-114

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the first sentence, substituted “Pipeline Inspection, Protection, Enforcement, and Safety Act of 2006, 49 U.S.C. § 60101, et seq.” for “Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968, 49 U.S.C. 1671 through 1687”, substituted “may be subject” for “shall be subject”, and substituted “one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00)” for “twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00)”, and in the second sentence, substituted “one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)” for “five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00).”

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “Pipeline Safety, Regulatory Certainty and Job Creation Act of 2011” for “Pipeline Inspection, Protection, Enforcement, and Safety Act of 2006.”

Editor's notes. —

The Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968 has been repealed. For present similar provisions, see the Accountable Pipeline Safety and Partnership Act of 1996, 49 U.S.C. § 60101 et seq.

§ 37-2-129.
Civil penalty for violation of federal Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968; compromise and recovery thereof.

Such civil penalty may be compromised by the commission, and such determination shall be in the nature of a final order appealable by the person alleged to have committed the violation only upon his refusal to pay. In determining the amount of the penalty, or the amount agreed upon in compromise, the size of the business of the person charged, the gravity of the violation and the good faith of the person charged in attempting to achieve compliance after notification of a violation shall be considered. The amount of the penalty when finally determined, or the amount agreed upon in compromise may be deducted from any sums owing by the state to the person charged or may be recovered in a civil action in the state courts.

Any action to recover said sums shall be commenced in the courts in and for the county or district in which the principal office of the commission is located.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 23, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

The Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968 has been repealed. For present similar provisions, see the Accountable Pipeline Safety and Partnership Act of 1996, 49 U.S.C. § 60101 et seq.

§ 37-2-130.
Right of review.

A person adversely affected or aggrieved by any action, findings, conclusions or decision of the public service commission is entitled to judicial review thereof according to the procedures established by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§

16-3-101

et seq.] and the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure. The standards to be applied, to judicial review proceedings, including scope of review, shall be those standards established in the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 52, § 1.

Applied

in

Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 662 P.2d 878,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 312

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 37-2-131.
Supplemental safety jurisdiction of commission.

The commission shall have regulatory safety jurisdiction over any “intrastate gas pipeline facility” as defined under the Pipeline Inspection, Protection, Enforcement, and Safety Act of 2006, 49 U.S.C. § 60101, et seq., as amended, for the sole purpose of implementing the safety standards and practices of the federal act to such intrastate gas pipeline facility. This jurisdiction shall not apply to an “intrastate gas pipeline facility” which is otherwise subject to federal regulatory jurisdiction for safety purposes. The commission is authorized under this section to implement such safety standards and practices only to the extent the secretary of transportation is so authorized under the Pipeline Inspection, Protection, Enforcement, and Safety Act of 2006. The commission’s jurisdiction under this section shall only apply where the secretary of transportation has delegated, or otherwise authorized, the state of Wyoming to act on his behalf, and the state of Wyoming has formally accepted the delegation or other authorization prior to the exercise of the jurisdiction by the commission.

The commission shall have safety jurisdiction over any new or existing electrical lines used by the owner to transmit electricity which is generated by the owner for resale, and which are located upon property not exclusively controlled by the owner of the line for the purpose of enforcement of the safety requirements of the National Electrical Safety Code and those safety standards adopted by the commission. This section shall not apply to any incorporated or chartered city or town established under Wyoming law or joint powers board created under the Wyoming Joint Powers Act.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 192, § 1; 2009, ch. 144, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), substituted “Pipeline Inspection, Protection, Enforcement, and Safety Act of 2006” for “Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968” or similar language in the first and third sentences, added “and the state of Wyoming has formally accepted the delegation or other authorization prior to the exercise of the jurisdiction by the commission” at the end, and deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The supplemental safety jurisdiction granted under this section shall not include the gathering of gas by pipeline in any rural locations which lie outside the limits of any incorporated or unincorporated city, town, village or any other designated residential or commercial area such as a subdivision, a business or shopping center, a community development or any similarly populated area.”

Editor's notes. —

The Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968 has been repealed. For present similar provisions, see the Accountable Pipeline Safety and Partnership Act of 1996, 49 U.S.C. § 60101 et seq.

Wyoming Joint Powers Act. —

See §§

16-1-102

and 16-1-103(a)(ii).

Cited

in

Bridle Bit Ranch Co. v. Basin Elec. Power Coop., 2005 WY 108, 118 P.3d 996,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(2005).

§ 37-2-132.
Determination of telephone prefixes; report to national do-not-call list.

The public service commission may determine which prefixes or telephone numbers are used in Wyoming primarily for cellular telephone service by determining prefixes or telephone numbers or by utilizing information available from the North American numbering plan administrator, the national pooling administrator, the local number portability administrator or any suitable least cost alternative as determined by the commission. The commission shall report these prefixes and telephone numbers to the national do-not-call list.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 88, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2010, ch. 88, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.